District of Columbia statutes.
8-151.09

Grants office; establishment.

There shall be established within DDOE a grants office that shall have a grants development staff that will support DDOE grant writing efforts by:

(1)

Identifying potential grant opportunities;

(2)

Writing grant applications;

(3)

Assisting DDOE programs in grant writing, including providing letters of support to community organizations seeking grants upon request;

(4)

Reviewing draft proposals; and

(5)

Following approval by the Director, or his designee, pursuant to § 8-151.07(9) timely submit grant applications and proposals.

Feb. 15, 2006, D.C. Law 16-51, § 109, 52 DCR 10812